Illinois, session 104th, SB2322.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act is 5amended by changing Sections 1, 2, 4, 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 12, 614, 17.8, 18, 20, and 23 and by adding Sections 24, 26, and 27 7as follows: 8    (20 ILCS 3305/1)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1051)9    Sec. 1. Short Title. This Act may be cited as the IEMA-OHS 10Illinois Emergency Management Agency Act.11(Source: P.A. 87-168.) 12    (20 ILCS 3305/2)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1052)13    Sec. 2. Policy and Purposes. 14    (a) Because of the possibility of the occurrence of 15disasters of unprecedented size and destructiveness resulting 16from the explosion in this or in neighboring states of atomic 17or other means from without or by means of sabotage or other 18disloyal actions within, or from fire, flood, earthquake, 19telecommunications failure, or other natural or technological 20causes, and in order to insure that this State will be prepared 21to and will adequately deal with any disasters, preserve the 22lives and property of the people of this State and protect the   SB2322- 2 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1public peace, health, and safety in the event of a disaster, it 2is found and declared to be necessary: 3        (1) To create a State emergency management and 4    homeland security agency an Illinois Emergency Management 5    Agency and to authorize emergency management and homeland 6    security programs within the political subdivisions of the 7    State. 8        (2) To confer upon the Governor and upon the principal 9    executive officer of the political subdivisions of the 10    State the powers provided herein. 11        (3) To provide for the rendering of mutual aid among 12    the political subdivisions and taxing districts of the 13    State and with other states and with respect to the 14    carrying out of an emergency management and homeland 15    security programs program.16    (b) It is further declared to be the purpose of this Act 17and the policy of the State that all emergency management and 18homeland security programs of this State be coordinated to the 19maximum extent with the comparable programs of the federal 20government, including its various departments and agencies, of 21other states and localities and private agencies of every 22type, to the end that the most effective preparation and use 23may be made of the nation's resources and facilities for 24dealing with any disaster that may occur.25(Source: P.A. 87-168; 88-606, eff. 1-1-95.)   SB2322- 3 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    (20 ILCS 3305/4)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1054)2    Sec. 4. Definitions. As used in this Act, unless the 3context clearly indicates otherwise, the following words and 4terms have the meanings ascribed to them in this Section:5    "Coordinator" means the staff assistant to the principal 6executive officer of a political subdivision with the duty of 7coordinating the emergency management programs of that 8political subdivision.9    "Cyber incident" means an event occurring on or conducted 10through a computer network that actually or imminently 11jeopardizes the integrity, confidentiality, or availability of 12computers, information or communications systems or networks, 13physical or virtual infrastructure controlled by computers or 14information systems, or information resident thereon that 15affect or control infrastructure or communications networks 16utilized by the public. "Cyber incident" includes a 17vulnerability in information systems, system security 18procedures, internal controls, or implementations that could 19be exploited by a threat source that affect or control 20infrastructure or communications networks utilized by the 21public.22    "Disaster" means an occurrence or threat of widespread or 23severe damage, injury or loss of life or property resulting 24from any natural, technological, or human cause, including but 25not limited to fire, flood, earthquake, wind, storm, hazardous 26materials spill or other water contamination requiring   SB2322- 4 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1emergency action to avert danger or damage, epidemic, air 2contamination, blight, extended periods of severe and 3inclement weather, drought, infestation, critical shortages of 4essential fuels and energy, explosion, riot, hostile military 5or paramilitary action, public health emergencies, cyber 6incidents, or acts of domestic terrorism.7    "Emergency Management" means the efforts of the State and 8the political subdivisions to develop, plan, analyze, conduct, 9provide, implement and maintain programs for disaster 10mitigation, preparedness, response and recovery.11    "Emergency Services and Disaster Agency" means the agency 12by this name, by the name Emergency Management Agency, or by 13any other name that is established by ordinance within a 14political subdivision to coordinate the emergency management 15program within that political subdivision and with private 16organizations, other political subdivisions, the State and 17federal governments.18    "Emergency Operations Plan" means the written plan of the 19State and political subdivisions describing the organization, 20mission, and functions of the government and supporting 21services for responding to and recovering from disasters and 22shall include plans that take into account the needs of those 23individuals with household pets and service animals following 24a major disaster or emergency.25    "Emergency Services" means the coordination of functions 26by the State and its political subdivisions subdivision, other   SB2322- 5 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1than functions for which military forces are primarily 2responsible, as may be necessary or proper to prevent, 3minimize, repair, and alleviate injury and damage resulting 4from any natural or technological causes. These functions 5include, without limitation, fire fighting services, police 6services, emergency aviation services, medical and health 7services, HazMat and technical rescue teams, rescue, 8engineering, warning services, communications, radiological, 9chemical and other special weapons defense, evacuation of 10persons from stricken or threatened areas, emergency assigned 11functions of plant protection, temporary restoration of public 12utility services and other functions related to civilian 13protection, together with all other activities necessary or 14incidental to protecting life or property.15    "Exercise" means a planned event realistically simulating 16a disaster, conducted for the purpose of evaluating the 17political subdivision's coordinated emergency management 18capabilities or evaluating the State's emergency management 19and homeland security capabilities, including, but not limited 20to, testing the emergency operations plan.21    "HazMat team" means a career or volunteer mobile support 22team that has been authorized by a unit of local government to 23respond to hazardous materials emergencies and that is 24primarily designed for emergency response to chemical or 25biological terrorism, radiological emergencies, hazardous 26material spills, releases, or fires, or other contamination   SB2322- 6 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1events. 2    "Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 3Homeland Security" or "Agency" means the agency established by 4this Act within the executive branch of State Government 5responsible for coordination of the overall emergency 6management and homeland security programs program of the State 7and with private organizations, political subdivisions, and 8the federal government. "Illinois Emergency Management Agency 9and Office of Homeland Security" also means the State 10Emergency Response Commission responsible for the 11implementation of Title III of the Superfund Amendments and 12Reauthorization Act of 1986.13    "Interoperable communications" means the ability of 14emergency response providers and relevant State and local 15government agencies to communicate through a dedicated public 16safety network, utilizing information technology systems and 17radio communications systems, and to exchange voice, data, and 18video on demand in real time. 19    "Mobile Support Team" means a group of individuals 20designated as a team by the Governor or Director to train prior 21to and to be dispatched, if the Governor or the Director so 22determines, to aid and reinforce the State and political 23subdivision emergency management efforts in response to a 24disaster.25    "Municipality" means any city, village, and incorporated 26town.  SB2322- 7 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    "Political Subdivision" means any county, city, village, 2or incorporated town or township if the township is in a county 3having a population of more than 2,000,000.4    "Principal Executive Officer" means chair of the county 5board, supervisor of a township if the township is in a county 6having a population of more than 2,000,000, mayor of a city or 7incorporated town, president of a village, or in their absence 8or disability, the interim successor as established under 9Section 7 of the Emergency Interim Executive Succession Act.10    "Public health emergency" means an occurrence or imminent 11threat of an illness or health condition that:12        (a) is believed to be caused by any of the following:13            (i) bioterrorism;14            (ii) the appearance of a novel or previously 15        controlled or eradicated infectious agent or 16        biological toxin;17            (iii) a natural disaster;18            (iv) a chemical attack or accidental release; or19            (v) a nuclear attack or accident; and20        (b) poses a high probability of any of the following 21    harms:22            (i) a large number of deaths in the affected 23        population;24            (ii) a large number of serious or long-term 25        disabilities in the affected population; or26            (iii) widespread exposure to an infectious or   SB2322- 8 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        toxic agent that poses a significant risk of 2        substantial future harm to a large number of people in 3        the affected population.4    "Statewide mutual aid organization" means an entity with 5local government members throughout the State that facilitates 6temporary assistance through its members in a particular 7public safety discipline, such as police, fire or emergency 8management, when an occurrence exceeds a member jurisdiction's 9capabilities. 10    "Technical rescue team" means a career or volunteer mobile 11support team that has been authorized by a unit of local 12government to respond to building collapse, high angle rescue, 13and other specialized rescue emergencies and that is primarily 14designated for emergency response to technical rescue events. 15(Source: P.A. 102-485, eff. 8-20-21.) 16    (20 ILCS 3305/5)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1055)17    Sec. 5. Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of 18Homeland Security. 19    (a) There is created within the executive branch of the 20State Government an Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 21Office of Homeland Security and a Director of the Illinois 22Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security, 23herein called the "Director" who shall be the head thereof. 24The Director shall be appointed by the Governor, with the 25advice and consent of the Senate, and shall serve for a term of   SB2322- 9 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b12 years beginning on the third Monday in January of the 2odd-numbered year, and until a successor is appointed and has 3qualified; except that the term of the first Director 4appointed under this Act shall expire on the third Monday in 5January, 1989. The Director shall not hold any other 6remunerative public office. For terms beginning after January 718, 2019 (the effective date of Public Act 100-1179) and 8before January 16, 2023, the annual salary of the Director 9shall be as provided in Section 5-300 of the Civil 10Administrative Code of Illinois. Notwithstanding any other 11provision of law, for terms beginning on or after January 16, 122023, the Director shall receive an annual salary of $180,000 13or as set by the Governor, whichever is higher. On July 1, 142023, and on each July 1 thereafter, the Director shall 15receive an increase in salary based on a cost of living 16adjustment as authorized by Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 1786th General Assembly. 18    For terms beginning on or after January 16, 2023, the 19Assistant Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 20shall receive an annual salary of $156,600 or as set by the 21Governor, whichever is higher. On July 1, 2023, and on each 22July 1 thereafter, the Assistant Director shall receive an 23increase in salary based on a cost of living adjustment as 24authorized by Senate Joint Resolution 192 of the 86th General 25Assembly. 26    (b) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall obtain,   SB2322- 10 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1under the provisions of the Personnel Code, technical, 2clerical, stenographic and other administrative personnel, and 3may make expenditures within the appropriation therefor as may 4be necessary to carry out the purpose of this Act. The agency 5created by this Act is intended to be a successor to the agency 6created under the Illinois Emergency Services and Disaster 7Agency Act of 1975 and the personnel, equipment, records, and 8appropriations of that agency are transferred to the successor 9agency as of June 30, 1988 (the effective date of this Act).10    (c) The Director, subject to the direction and control of 11the Governor, shall be the executive head of the Illinois 12Emergency Management Agency and the State Emergency Response 13Commission and shall be responsible under the direction of the 14Governor, for carrying out the programs program for emergency 15management, nuclear and radiation safety, and homeland 16security of this State. The Director shall also maintain 17liaison and cooperate with the emergency management, nuclear 18and radiation safety, and homeland security organizations of 19this State and other states and of the federal government.20    (d) The Agency shall have the following emergency 21management duties:22        (1) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall 23    take an integral part in the development and revision of 24    political subdivision emergency operations plans prepared 25    under paragraph (f) of Section 10. To this end it shall 26    employ or otherwise secure the services of professional   SB2322- 11 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    and technical personnel capable of providing expert 2    assistance to the emergency services and disaster 3    agencies. These personnel shall consult with emergency 4    services and disaster agencies on a regular basis and 5    shall make field examinations of the areas, circumstances, 6    and conditions that particular political subdivision 7    emergency operations plans are intended to apply.8        (2) (e) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 9    political subdivisions shall be encouraged to form an 10    emergency management advisory committee composed of 11    private and public personnel representing the emergency 12    management phases of mitigation, preparedness, response, 13    and recovery. The Local Emergency Planning Committee, as 14    created under the Illinois Emergency Planning and 15    Community Right to Know Act, shall serve as an advisory 16    committee to the emergency services and disaster agency or 17    agencies serving within the boundaries of that Local 18    Emergency Planning Committee planning district for:19            (A) (1) the development of emergency operations 20        plan provisions for hazardous chemical emergencies; 21        and22            (B) (2) the assessment of emergency response 23        capabilities related to hazardous chemical 24        emergencies.25        (3) (f) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency 26    shall:  SB2322- 12 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1            (A) (1) Coordinate the overall emergency 2        management program of the State.3            (B) (2) Cooperate with local governments, the 4        federal government, and any public or private agency 5        or entity in achieving any purpose of this Act and in 6        implementing emergency management programs for 7        mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery.8            (2.5) Develop a comprehensive emergency 9        preparedness and response plan for any nuclear 10        accident in accordance with Section 65 of the Nuclear 11        Safety Law of 2004 and in development of the Illinois 12        Nuclear Safety Preparedness program in accordance with 13        Section 8 of the Illinois Nuclear Safety Preparedness 14        Act.15            (C) (2.6) Coordinate with the Department of Public 16        Health with respect to planning for and responding to 17        public health emergencies.18            (D) (3) Prepare, for issuance by the Governor, 19        executive orders, proclamations, and regulations as 20        necessary or appropriate in coping with disasters.21            (E) (4) Promulgate rules and requirements for 22        political subdivision emergency operations plans that 23        are not inconsistent with and are at least as 24        stringent as applicable federal laws and regulations.25            (F) (5) Review and approve, in accordance with 26        Illinois Emergency Management Agency rules, emergency   SB2322- 13 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        operations plans for those political subdivisions 2        required to have an emergency services and disaster 3        agency pursuant to this Act.4            (G) (5.5) Promulgate rules and requirements for 5        the political subdivision emergency management 6        exercises, including, but not limited to, exercises of 7        the emergency operations plans.8            (H) (5.10) Review, evaluate, and approve, in 9        accordance with Illinois Emergency Management Agency 10        rules, political subdivision emergency management 11        exercises for those political subdivisions required to 12        have an emergency services and disaster agency 13        pursuant to this Act.14            (I) (6) Determine requirements of the State and 15        its political subdivisions for food, clothing, and 16        other necessities in event of a disaster.17            (J) (7) Establish a register of persons with types 18        of emergency management training and skills in 19        mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery. 20            (K) (8) Establish a register of government and 21        private response resources available for use in a 22        disaster.23            (L) (9) Expand the Earthquake Awareness Program 24        and its efforts to distribute earthquake preparedness 25        materials to schools, political subdivisions, 26        community groups, civic organizations, and the media.   SB2322- 14 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        Emphasis will be placed on those areas of the State 2        most at risk from an earthquake. Maintain the list of 3        all school districts, hospitals, airports, power 4        plants, including nuclear power plants, lakes, dams, 5        emergency response facilities of all types, and all 6        other major public or private structures which are at 7        the greatest risk of damage from earthquakes under 8        circumstances where the damage would cause subsequent 9        harm to the surrounding communities and residents.10            (M) (10) Disseminate all information, completely 11        and without delay, on water levels for rivers and 12        streams and any other data pertaining to potential 13        flooding supplied by the Division of Water Resources 14        within the Department of Natural Resources to all 15        political subdivisions to the maximum extent possible.16            (N) (11) Develop agreements, if feasible, with 17        medical supply and equipment firms to supply resources 18        as are necessary to respond to an earthquake or any 19        other disaster as defined in this Act. These resources 20        will be made available upon notifying the vendor of 21        the disaster. Payment for the resources will be in 22        accordance with Section 7 of this Act. The Illinois 23        Department of Public Health shall determine which 24        resources will be required and requested.25            (O) (11.5) In coordination with the Illinois State 26        Police, develop and implement a community outreach   SB2322- 15 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        program to promote awareness among the State's parents 2        and children of child abduction prevention and 3        response.4            (P) (12) Out of funds appropriated for these 5        purposes, award capital and non-capital grants to 6        Illinois hospitals or health care facilities located 7        outside of a city with a population in excess of 8        1,000,000 to be used for purposes that include, but 9        are not limited to, preparing to respond to mass 10        casualties and disasters, maintaining and improving 11        patient safety and quality of care, and protecting the 12        confidentiality of patient information. No single 13        grant for a capital expenditure shall exceed $300,000. 14        No single grant for a non-capital expenditure shall 15        exceed $100,000. In awarding such grants, preference 16        shall be given to hospitals that serve a significant 17        number of Medicaid recipients, but do not qualify for 18        disproportionate share hospital adjustment payments 19        under the Illinois Public Aid Code. To receive such a 20        grant, a hospital or health care facility must provide 21        funding of at least 50% of the cost of the project for 22        which the grant is being requested. In awarding such 23        grants the Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall 24        consider the recommendations of the Illinois Hospital 25        Association.26            (Q) (13) Do all other things necessary, incidental   SB2322- 16 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        or appropriate for the implementation of this Act.2        (4) (g) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is 3    authorized to make grants to various higher education 4    institutions, public K-12 school districts, area 5    vocational centers as designated by the State Board of 6    Education, inter-district special education cooperatives, 7    regional safe schools, and nonpublic K-12 schools for 8    safety and security improvements. For the purpose of this 9    paragraph subsection (g), "higher education institution" 10    means a public university, a public community college, or 11    an independent, not-for-profit or for-profit higher 12    education institution located in this State. Grants made 13    under this paragraph subsection (g) shall be paid out of 14    moneys appropriated for that purpose from the Build 15    Illinois Bond Fund. The Illinois Emergency Management 16    Agency shall adopt rules to implement this paragraph 17    subsection (g). These rules may specify: (i) the manner of 18    applying for grants; (ii) project eligibility 19    requirements; (iii) restrictions on the use of grant 20    moneys; (iv) the manner in which the various higher 21    education institutions must account for the use of grant 22    moneys; and (v) any other provision that the Illinois 23    Emergency Management Agency determines to be necessary or 24    useful for the administration of this paragraph subsection 25    (g).26        (5) (g-5) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is   SB2322- 17 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    authorized to make grants to not-for-profit organizations 2    which are exempt from federal income taxation under 3    section 501(c)(3) of the Federal Internal Revenue Code for 4    eligible security improvements that assist the 5    organization in preventing, preparing for, or responding 6    to threats, attacks, or acts of terrorism. To be eligible 7    for a grant under the program, the Agency must determine 8    that the organization is at a high risk of being subject to 9    threats, attacks, or acts of terrorism based on the 10    organization's profile, ideology, mission, or beliefs. 11    Eligible security improvements shall include all eligible 12    preparedness activities under the federal Nonprofit 13    Security Grant Program, including, but not limited to, 14    physical security upgrades, security training exercises, 15    preparedness training exercises, contracting with security 16    personnel, and any other security upgrades deemed eligible 17    by the Director. Eligible security improvements shall not 18    duplicate, in part or in whole, a project included under 19    any awarded federal grant or in a pending federal 20    application. The Director shall establish procedures and 21    forms by which applicants may apply for a grant and 22    procedures for distributing grants to recipients. Any 23    security improvements awarded shall remain at the physical 24    property listed in the grant application, unless 25    authorized by Agency rule or approved by the Agency in 26    writing. The procedures shall require each applicant to do   SB2322- 18 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    the following:2            (A) (1) identify and substantiate prior or current 3        threats, attacks, or acts of terrorism against the 4        not-for-profit organization;5            (B) (2) indicate the symbolic or strategic value 6        of one or more sites that renders the site a possible 7        target of a threat, attack, or act of terrorism;8            (C) (3) discuss potential consequences to the 9        organization if the site is damaged, destroyed, or 10        disrupted by a threat, attack, or act of terrorism;11            (D) (4) describe how the grant will be used to 12        integrate organizational preparedness with broader 13        State and local preparedness efforts, as described by 14        the Agency in each Notice of Opportunity for Funding;15            (E) (5) submit (i) a vulnerability assessment 16        conducted by experienced security, law enforcement, or 17        military personnel, or conducted using an 18        Agency-approved or federal Nonprofit Security Grant 19        Program self-assessment tool, and (ii) a description 20        of how the grant award will be used to address the 21        vulnerabilities identified in the assessment; and22            (F) (6) submit any other relevant information as 23        may be required by the Director.24    The Agency is authorized to use funds appropriated for the 25grant program described in this paragraph (5) subsection (g-5) 26to administer the program.   SB2322- 19 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    (e) The Agency shall have the following homeland security 2duties:3        (1) The Homeland Security Advisor is established as 4    follows:5            (A) A Homeland Security Advisor shall be appointed 6        by, and report to, the Governor, with the advice and 7        consent of the Senate. The Homeland Security Advisor 8        shall serve a 4-year term. The Governor may, in his 9        discretion, appoint one or more Deputy Homeland 10        Security Advisors to function in the absence of the 11        Homeland Security Advisor on such portfolios as he or 12        she deems appropriate.13            (B) The Homeland Security advisor shall be 14        responsible for leading the State's strategic response 15        and policy recommendations on all matters pertaining 16        to homeland security, including, but not limited to, 17        development and execution of Statewide prevention 18        efforts associated with violence/targeted violence, 19        terrorism, domestic violent extremism, school safety, 20        cybersecurity, critical infrastructure protection, 21        online safety, public safety training, and mutual aid 22        assistance.23            (C) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency and 24        Office of Homeland Security shall coordinate with and 25        provide administrative support for the Homeland 26        Security Advisor. The Homeland Security Advisor shall   SB2322- 20 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        not hold any other remunerative public office unless 2        the individual is also appointed as a State agency 3        director or secretary.4            (D) Coordinates with all executive State agencies, 5        regarding the matters of homeland security. Each 6        executive agency shall coordinate and provide 7        briefings to the Homeland Security Advisor to produce 8        unified State strategies on homeland security.9        (2) The Agency shall:10            (A) Coordinate and provide administrative support 11        for the Homeland Security Advisor.12            (B) Oversee, consult, and coordinate comprehensive 13        strategic response and policy recommendations for the 14        Homeland Security Advisor pertaining to all non-law 15        enforcement matters of homeland security for the 16        State. Such matters shall include the assessment, 17        development, and implementation of policies, 18        protocols, and strategies for the prevention, 19        preparedness, and recovery efforts associated with 20        targeted violence, terrorism, domestic violent 21        extremism, school safety, cybersecurity, critical 22        infrastructure protection, and online safety. The 23        Agency shall also coordinate local, State, and federal 24        agencies in public safety training and mutual aid 25        assistance.26            (C) Serve as the primary liaison for non-law   SB2322- 21 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        enforcement national security matters with the U.S. 2        Department of Homeland Security (DHS), the Federal 3        Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), the Cybersecurity 4        and Infrastructure Security Agency (CISA), the Federal 5        Bureau of Investigation (FBI), the Office of the 6        Director of National Intelligence (ODNI), and any 7        other federal agencies for matters pertaining to 8        homeland security in the State.9            (D) Consult and Coordinates with the Illinois 10        State Police to provide the U.S. Department of 11        Homeland Security (DHS) with relevant 12        counterterrorism, cyber, and transnational organized 13        crime reporting data pertaining to the State.14            (E) Conduct public risk communication messaging.15            (F) Adopt rules, regulations, and requirements 16        necessary for implementation of the homeland security 17        programs reflected in this Section.18    (f) The Agency shall have the following nuclear and 19radiation safety duties:20        (1) The Agency shall exercise, administer, and enforce 21    all rights, powers, and duties for nuclear and radiation 22    safety authorized in the Nuclear Safety Law of 2004, 20 23    ILCS 3310/, or successor statutes.24        (2) The Agency shall develop a comprehensive emergency 25    preparedness and response plan for any nuclear accident in 26    accordance with Section 65 of the Nuclear Safety Law of   SB2322- 22 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    2004 and in development of the Illinois Nuclear Safety 2    Preparedness program in accordance with Section 8 of the 3    Illinois Nuclear Safety Preparedness Act, or successor 4    statute. 5        (3) The Agency shall have the right to enter on public 6    and private property in order to take soil and air samples 7    for response to a disaster that causes radioactive 8    contamination. 9    Any Agency Notice of Opportunity for Funding, proposed or 10final rulemaking, guidance, training opportunity, or other 11resource related to the grant program must be published on the 12Agency's publicly available website, and any announcements 13related to funding shall be shared with all State legislative 14offices, the Governor's office, emergency services and 15disaster agencies mandated or required pursuant to subsections 16(b) through (d) of Section 10, and any other State agencies as 17determined by the Agency. Subject to appropriation, the grant 18application period shall be open for no less than 45 calendar 19days during the first application cycle each fiscal year, 20unless the Agency determines that a shorter period is 21necessary to avoid conflicts with the annual federal Nonprofit 22Security Grant Program funding cycle. Additional application 23cycles may be conducted during the same fiscal year, subject 24to availability of funds. Upon request, Agency staff shall 25provide reasonable assistance to any applicant in completing a 26grant application or meeting a post-award requirement.   SB2322- 23 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    In addition to any advance payment rules or procedures 2adopted by the Agency, the Agency shall adopt rules or 3procedures by which grantees under this subsection (g-5) may 4receive a working capital advance of initial start-up costs 5and up to 2 months of program expenses, not to exceed 25% of 6the total award amount, if, during the application process, 7the grantee demonstrates a need for funds to commence a 8project. The remaining funds must be paid through 9reimbursement after the grantee presents sufficient supporting 10documentation of expenditures for eligible activities. 11    (g) (h) Except as provided in Section 17.5 of this Act, any 12moneys received by the Agency from donations or sponsorships 13unrelated to a disaster shall be deposited in the Emergency 14Planning and Training Fund and used by the Agency, subject to 15appropriation, to effectuate planning and training activities. 16Any moneys received by the Agency from donations during a 17disaster and intended for disaster response or recovery shall 18be deposited into the Disaster Response and Recovery Fund and 19used for disaster response and recovery pursuant to the 20Disaster Relief Act. 21    (h) (i) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency may by 22rule assess and collect reasonable fees for attendance at 23Agency-sponsored conferences to enable the Agency to carry out 24the requirements of this Act. Any moneys received under this 25subsection shall be deposited in the Emergency Planning and 26Training Fund and used by the Agency, subject to   SB2322- 24 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1appropriation, for planning and training activities.2    (i) (j) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency is 3authorized to make grants to other State agencies, public 4universities, units of local government, and statewide mutual 5aid organizations to enhance statewide emergency preparedness 6and response. The Agency shall adopt rules for implementation 7of State-funded grant programs.8    (j) The Agency shall do all other things necessary, 9incidental or appropriate for the implementation of this Act, 10including the promulgation of rules in accordance with the 11Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 12    (k) Subject to appropriation from the Emergency Planning 13and Training Fund, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency 14and Office of Homeland Security shall obtain training services 15and support for local emergency services and support for local 16emergency services and disaster agencies for training, 17exercises, and equipment related to carbon dioxide pipelines 18and sequestration, and, subject to the availability of 19funding, shall provide $5,000 per year to the Illinois Fire 20Service Institute for first responder training required under 21Section 4-615 of the Public Utilities Act. Amounts in the 22Emergency Planning and Training Fund will be used by the 23Illinois Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland 24Security for administrative costs incurred in carrying out the 25requirements of this subsection. To carry out the purposes of 26this subsection, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and   SB2322- 25 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1Office of Homeland Security may accept moneys from all 2authorized sources into the Emergency Planning and Training 3Fund, including, but not limited to, transfers from the Carbon 4Dioxide Sequestration Administrative Fund and the Public 5Utility Fund. 6    (l) (k) The Agency shall do all other things necessary, 7incidental, or appropriate for the implementation of this Act, 8including the adoption of rules in accordance with the 9Illinois Administrative Procedure Act. 10(Source: P.A. 102-16, eff. 6-17-21; 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 11102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 102-1115, eff. 1-9-23; 103-418, eff. 121-1-24; 103-588, eff. 1-1-25; 103-651, eff. 7-18-24; 103-999, 13eff. 1-1-25; revised 11-26-24.) 14    (20 ILCS 3305/6)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1056)15    Sec. 6. Emergency Management Powers of the Governor. 16    (a) The Governor shall have general direction and control 17of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency and shall be 18responsible for the carrying out of the provisions of this 19Act.20    (b) In performing duties under this Act, the Governor is 21authorized to cooperate with the federal government and with 22other states in all matters pertaining to emergency 23management, nuclear and radiation safety, and homeland 24security.25    (c) In performing duties under this Act, the Governor is   SB2322- 26 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1further authorized: 2        (1) To make, amend, and rescind all lawful necessary 3    orders, rules, and regulations to carry out the provisions 4    of this Act within the limits of the authority conferred 5    upon the Governor. 6        (2) To prepare cause to be prepared a comprehensive 7    plans plan and programs program for the emergency 8    management, nuclear and radiation safety, and homeland 9    security of this State, which plan and program shall be 10    integrated into and coordinated with emergency management, 11    nuclear and radiation safety, and homeland security plans 12    and programs of the federal government and of other states 13    whenever possible and which plan and program may include: 14            a. Mitigation of injury and damage caused by 15        disaster. 16            b. Prompt and effective response to disaster. 17            c. Emergency relief. 18            d. Identification of areas particularly vulnerable 19        to disasters. 20            e. Recommendations for zoning, building, and other 21        land-use controls, safety measures for securing 22        permanent structures and other mitigation measures 23        designed to eliminate or reduce disasters or their 24        impact. 25            f. Assistance to political subdivisions in 26        designing emergency operations plans.   SB2322- 27 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1            g. Authorization and procedures for the erection 2        or other construction of temporary works designed to 3        mitigate danger, damage or loss from flood, or other 4        disaster. 5            h. Preparation and distribution to the appropriate 6        State and political subdivision officials of a State 7        catalog of federal, State, and private assistance 8        programs. 9            i. Organization of State personnel and chains of 10        command. 11            j. Coordination of federal, State, and political 12        subdivision emergency management, nuclear and 13        radiation safety, and homeland security activities. 14            k. Other necessary matters. 15        (3) In accordance with the plans plan and programs 16    program for the emergency management, nuclear and 17    radiation safety, and homeland security of this State, and 18    out of funds appropriated for these purposes, to procure 19    and preposition supplies, medicines, materials and 20    equipment, to institute training programs and public 21    information programs, and to take all other preparatory 22    steps including the partial or full mobilization of 23    emergency services and disaster agencies in advance of 24    actual disaster to insure the furnishing of adequately 25    trained and equipped forces for disaster response and 26    recovery.   SB2322- 28 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        (4) Out of funds appropriated for these purposes, to 2    make studies and surveys of the industries, resources, and 3    facilities in this State as may be necessary to ascertain 4    the capabilities of the State for emergency management 5    phases of mitigation, preparedness, response, and recovery 6    and to plan for the most efficient emergency use thereof. 7        (5) On behalf of this State, to negotiate for and 8    submit to the General Assembly for its approval or 9    rejection reciprocal mutual aid agreements or compacts 10    with other states, either on a statewide or political 11    subdivision basis. The agreements or compacts, shall be 12    limited to the furnishing or exchange of food, clothing, 13    medical or other supplies, engineering and police 14    services; emergency housing and feeding; National and 15    State Guards while under the control of the State; health, 16    medical, and related services; fire fighting, rescue, 17    transportation, communication, and construction services 18    and equipment, provided, however, that if the General 19    Assembly be not in session and the Governor has not 20    proclaimed the existence of a disaster under this Section, 21    then the agreements or compacts shall instead be submitted 22    to an Interim Committee on Emergency Management composed 23    of 5 Senators appointed by the President of the Senate and 24    of 5 Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the 25    House, during the month of June of each odd-numbered year 26    to serve for a 2 year term, beginning July 1 of that year,   SB2322- 29 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    and until their successors are appointed and qualified, or 2    until termination of their legislative service, whichever 3    first occurs. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment for 4    the unexpired term in the same manner as original 5    appointments. All appointments shall be made in writing 6    and filed with the Secretary of State as a public record. 7    The Committee shall have the power to approve or reject 8    any agreements or compacts for and on behalf of the 9    General Assembly; and, provided further, that an 10    affirmative vote of 2/3 of the members of the Committee 11    shall be necessary for the approval of any agreement or 12    compact.13(Source: P.A. 92-73, eff. 1-1-02.) 14    (20 ILCS 3305/7)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1057)15    Sec. 7. Emergency Powers of the Governor. In the event of a 16disaster, as defined in Section 4, the Governor may, by 17proclamation declare that a disaster exists. Upon such 18proclamation, the Governor shall have and may exercise for a 19period not to exceed 30 days the following emergency powers; 20provided, however, that the lapse of the emergency powers 21shall not, as regards any act or acts occurring or committed 22within the 30-day period, deprive any person, firm, 23corporation, political subdivision, or body politic of any 24right or rights to compensation or reimbursement which he, 25she, it, or they may have under the provisions of this Act:  SB2322- 30 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        (1) To suspend the provisions of any regulatory 2    statute prescribing procedures for conduct of State 3    business, or the orders, rules and regulations of any 4    State agency, if strict compliance with the provisions of 5    any statute, order, rule, or regulation would in any way 6    prevent, hinder or delay necessary action, including 7    emergency purchases, by the Illinois Emergency Management 8    Agency, in coping with the disaster.9        (2) To utilize all available resources of the State 10    government as reasonably necessary to cope with the 11    disaster and of each political subdivision of the State.12        (3) To transfer the direction, personnel or functions 13    of State departments and agencies or units thereof for the 14    purpose of performing or facilitating disaster response 15    and recovery programs.16        (4) On behalf of this State to take possession of, and 17    to acquire full title or a lesser specified interest in, 18    any personal property as may be necessary to accomplish 19    the objectives set forth in Section 2 of this Act, 20    including: airplanes, automobiles, trucks, trailers, 21    buses, and other vehicles; coal, oils, gasoline, and other 22    fuels and means of propulsion; explosives, materials, 23    equipment, and supplies; animals and livestock; feed and 24    seed; food and provisions for humans and animals; clothing 25    and bedding; and medicines and medical and surgical 26    supplies; and to take possession of and for a limited   SB2322- 31 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    period occupy and use any real estate necessary to 2    accomplish those objectives; but only upon the undertaking 3    by the State to pay just compensation therefor as in this 4    Act provided, and then only under the following 5    provisions:6            a. The Governor, or the person or persons as the 7        Governor may authorize so to do, may forthwith take 8        possession of property for and on behalf of the State; 9        provided, however, that the Governor or persons shall 10        simultaneously with the taking, deliver to the owner 11        or his or her agent, if the identity of the owner or 12        agency is known or readily ascertainable, a signed 13        statement in writing, that shall include the name and 14        address of the owner, the date and place of the taking, 15        description of the property sufficient to identify it, 16        a statement of interest in the property that is being 17        so taken, and, if possible, a statement in writing, 18        signed by the owner, setting forth the sum that he or 19        she is willing to accept as just compensation for the 20        property or use. Whether or not the owner or agent is 21        known or readily ascertainable, a true copy of the 22        statement shall promptly be filed by the Governor or 23        the person with the Director, who shall keep the 24        docket of the statements. In cases where the sum that 25        the owner is willing to accept as just compensation is 26        less than $1,000, copies of the statements shall also   SB2322- 32 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        be filed by the Director with, and shall be passed upon 2        by an Emergency Management Claims Commission, 3        consisting of 3 disinterested citizens who shall be 4        appointed by the Governor, by and with the advice and 5        consent of the Senate, within 20 days after the 6        Governor's declaration of a disaster, and if the sum 7        fixed by them as just compensation be less than $1,000 8        and is accepted in writing by the owner, then the State 9        Treasurer out of funds appropriated for these 10        purposes, shall, upon certification thereof by the 11        Emergency Management Claims Commission, cause the sum 12        so certified forthwith to be paid to the owner. The 13        Emergency Management Claims Commission is hereby given 14        the power to issue appropriate subpoenas and to 15        administer oaths to witnesses and shall keep 16        appropriate minutes and other records of its actions 17        upon and the disposition made of all claims.18            b. When the compensation to be paid for the taking 19        or use of property or interest therein is not or cannot 20        be determined and paid under item a of this paragraph 21        (4), a petition in the name of The People of the State 22        of Illinois shall be promptly filed by the Director, 23        which filing may be enforced by mandamus, in the 24        circuit court of the county where the property or any 25        part thereof was located when initially taken or used 26        under the provisions of this Act praying that the   SB2322- 33 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        amount of compensation to be paid to the person or 2        persons interested therein be fixed and determined. 3        The petition shall include a description of the 4        property that has been taken, shall state the physical 5        condition of the property when taken, shall name as 6        defendants all interested parties, shall set forth the 7        sum of money estimated to be just compensation for the 8        property or interest therein taken or used, and shall 9        be signed by the Director. The litigation shall be 10        handled by the Attorney General for and on behalf of 11        the State.12            c. Just compensation for the taking or use of 13        property or interest therein shall be promptly 14        ascertained in proceedings and established by judgment 15        against the State, that shall include, as part of the 16        just compensation so awarded, interest at the rate of 17        6% per annum on the fair market value of the property 18        or interest therein from the date of the taking or use 19        to the date of the judgment; and the court may order 20        the payment of delinquent taxes and special 21        assessments out of the amount so awarded as just 22        compensation and may make any other orders with 23        respect to encumbrances, rents, insurance, and other 24        charges, if any, as shall be just and equitable.25        (5) When required by the exigencies of the disaster, 26    to sell, lend, rent, give, or distribute all or any part of   SB2322- 34 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    property so or otherwise acquired to the inhabitants of 2    this State, or to political subdivisions of this State, 3    or, under the interstate mutual aid agreements or compacts 4    as are entered into under the provisions of subparagraph 5    (5) of paragraph (c) of Section 6 to other states, and to 6    account for and transmit to the State Treasurer all funds, 7    if any, received therefor.8        (6) To recommend the evacuation of all or part of the 9    population from any stricken or threatened area within the 10    State if the Governor deems this action necessary.11        (7) To prescribe routes, modes of transportation, and 12    destinations in connection with evacuation.13        (8) To control ingress and egress to and from a 14    disaster area, the movement of persons within the area, 15    and the occupancy of premises therein.16        (9) To suspend or limit the sale, dispensing, or 17    transportation of alcoholic beverages, firearms, 18    explosives, and combustibles.19        (10) To make provision for the availability and use of 20    temporary emergency housing.21        (11) A proclamation of a disaster shall activate the 22    State Emergency Operations Plan, and political subdivision 23    emergency operations plans applicable to the political 24    subdivision or area in question and be authority for the 25    deployment and use of any forces that the plan or plans 26    apply and for use or distribution of any supplies,   SB2322- 35 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    equipment, and materials and facilities assembled, 2    stockpiled or arranged to be made available under this Act 3    or any other provision of law relating to disasters.4        (12) Control, restrict, and regulate by rationing, 5    freezing, use of quotas, prohibitions on shipments, price 6    fixing, allocation or other means, the use, sale or 7    distribution of food, feed, fuel, clothing and other 8    commodities, materials, goods, or services; and perform 9    and exercise any other functions, powers, and duties as 10    may be necessary to promote and secure the safety and 11    protection of the civilian population.12        (13) During the continuance of any disaster the 13    Governor is commander-in-chief of the organized and 14    unorganized militia and of all other forces available for 15    emergency duty. To the greatest extent practicable, the 16    Governor shall delegate or assign authority to the 17    Director to manage, coordinate, and direct all resources 18    by orders issued at the time of the disaster.19        (14) Prohibit increases in the prices of goods and 20    services during a disaster.21(Source: P.A. 102-485, eff. 8-20-21.) 22    (20 ILCS 3305/8)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1058)23    Sec. 8. Mobile Support Teams. 24    (a) The Governor or Director may cause to be created 25Mobile Support Teams to aid and to reinforce the Illinois   SB2322- 36 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1Emergency Management Agency, and emergency services and 2disaster agencies in areas stricken by disaster. Each mobile 3support team shall have a leader, selected by the Director who 4will be responsible, under the direction and control of the 5Director, for the organization, administration, and training, 6and operation of the mobile support team.7    (b) Personnel of a mobile support team while on duty 8pursuant to such a call or while engaged in regularly 9scheduled training or exercises, whether within or without the 10State, shall either: 11        (1) If they are paid employees of the State, have the 12    powers, duties, rights, privileges and immunities and 13    receive the compensation incidental to their employment. 14        (2) If they are paid employees of a political 15    subdivision or body politic of this State, and whether 16    serving within or without that political subdivision or 17    body politic, have the powers, duties, rights, privileges 18    and immunities, and receive the compensation incidental to 19    their employment. 20        (3) If they are not employees of the State, political 21    subdivision or body politic, or being such employees, are 22    not normally paid for their services, be entitled to at 23    least one dollar per year compensation from the State.24    Personnel of a mobile support team who suffer disease, 25injury or death arising out of or in the course of emergency 26duty, shall for the purposes of benefits under the Workers'   SB2322- 37 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1Compensation Act or Workers' Occupational Diseases Act only, 2be deemed to be employees of this State. If the person 3diseased, injured or killed is an employee described in item 4(3) above, the computation of benefits payable under either of 5those Acts shall be based on income commensurate with 6comparable State employees doing the same type of work or 7income from the person's regular employment, whichever is 8greater.9    All personnel of mobile support teams shall, while on duty 10under such call, be reimbursed by this State for all actual and 11necessary travel and subsistence expenses.12    (c) The State shall reimburse each political subdivision 13or body politic from the Disaster Response and Recovery Fund 14for the compensation paid and the actual and necessary travel, 15subsistence and maintenance expenses of paid employees of the 16political subdivision or body politic while serving, outside 17of its geographical boundaries pursuant to such a call, as 18members of a mobile support team, and for all payments made for 19death, disease or injury of those paid employees arising out 20of and incurred in the course of that duty, and for all losses 21of or damage to supplies and equipment of the political 22subdivision or body politic resulting from the operations.23    (d) Whenever mobile support teams or units of another 24state, while the Governor has the emergency powers provided 25for under Section 7 of this Act, render aid to this State under 26the orders of the Governor of its home state and upon the   SB2322- 38 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1request of the Governor of this State, all questions relating 2to reimbursement by this State to the other state and its 3citizens in regard to the assistance so rendered shall be 4determined by the mutual aid agreements or interstate compacts 5described in subparagraph (5) of paragraph (c) of Section 6 as 6are existing at the time of the assistance rendered or are 7entered into thereafter and under Section 303 (d) of the 8Federal Civil Defense Act of 1950.9    (e) No personnel of mobile support teams of this State may 10be ordered by the Governor to operate in any other state unless 11a request for the same has been made by the Governor or duly 12authorized representative of the other state.13(Source: P.A. 98-465, eff. 8-16-13.) 14    (20 ILCS 3305/10)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1060)15    Sec. 10. Emergency Services and Disaster Agencies. 16    (a) Each political subdivision within this State shall be 17within the jurisdiction of and served by the Illinois 18Emergency Management Agency and by an emergency services and 19disaster agency responsible for emergency management programs. 20A township, if the township is in a county having a population 21of more than 2,000,000, must have approval of the county 22coordinator before establishment of a township emergency 23services and disaster agency.24    (b) Unless multiple county emergency services and disaster 25agency consolidation is authorized by the Illinois Emergency   SB2322- 39 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1Management Agency with the consent of the respective counties, 2each county shall maintain an emergency services and disaster 3agency that has jurisdiction over and serves the entire 4county, except as otherwise provided under this Act and except 5that in any county with a population of over 3,000,000 6containing a municipality with a population of over 500,000 7the jurisdiction of the county agency shall not extend to the 8municipality when the municipality has established its own 9agency.10    (c) Each municipality with a population of over 500,000 11shall maintain an emergency services and disaster agency which 12has jurisdiction over and serves the entire municipality. A 13municipality with a population less than 500,000 may 14establish, by ordinance, an agency or department responsible 15for emergency management within the municipality's corporate 16limits.17    (d) The Governor shall determine which municipal 18corporations, other than those specified in paragraph (c) of 19this Section, need emergency services and disaster agencies of 20their own and require that they be established and maintained. 21The Governor shall make these determinations on the basis of 22the municipality's disaster vulnerability and capability of 23response related to population size and concentration. The 24emergency services and disaster agency of a county or 25township, shall not have a jurisdiction within a political 26subdivision having its own emergency services and disaster   SB2322- 40 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1agency, but shall cooperate with the emergency services and 2disaster agency of a city, village or incorporated town within 3their borders. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall 4publish and furnish a current list to the municipalities 5required to have an emergency services and disaster agency 6under this subsection.7    (e) Each municipality that is not required to and does not 8have an emergency services and disaster agency shall have a 9liaison officer designated to facilitate the cooperation and 10protection of that municipal corporation with the county 11emergency services and disaster agency in which it is located 12in the work of disaster mitigation, preparedness, response, 13and recovery.14    (f) The principal executive officer or his or her designee 15of each political subdivision in the State shall annually 16notify the Illinois Emergency Management Agency of the manner 17in which the political subdivision is providing or securing 18emergency management, identify the executive head of the 19agency or the department from which the service is obtained, 20or the liaison officer in accordance with subsection (e) 21paragraph (d) of this Section and furnish additional 22information relating thereto as the Illinois Emergency 23Management Agency requires.24    (g) Each emergency services and disaster agency shall 25prepare an emergency operations plan for its geographic 26boundaries that complies with planning, review, and approval   SB2322- 41 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1standards promulgated by the Illinois Emergency Management 2Agency. The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall 3determine which jurisdictions will be required to include 4earthquake preparedness in their local emergency operations 5plans.6    (h) The emergency services and disaster agency shall 7prepare and distribute to all appropriate officials in written 8form a clear and complete statement of the emergency 9responsibilities of all local departments and officials and of 10the disaster chain of command.11    (i) Each emergency services and disaster agency shall have 12a Coordinator who shall be appointed by the principal 13executive officer of the political subdivision in the same 14manner as are the heads of regular governmental departments. 15If the political subdivision is a county and the principal 16executive officer appoints the sheriff as the Coordinator, the 17sheriff may, in addition to his or her regular compensation, 18receive compensation at the same level as provided in Article 193 of the Counties Code Section 3 of "An Act in relation to the 20regulation of motor vehicle traffic and the promotion of 21safety on public highways in counties", approved August 9, 221951, as amended. The Coordinator shall have direct 23responsibility for the organization, administration, training, 24and operation of the emergency services and disaster agency, 25subject to the direction and control of that principal 26executive officer. Each emergency services and disaster agency   SB2322- 42 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1shall coordinate and may perform emergency management 2functions within the territorial limits of the political 3subdivision within which it is organized as are prescribed in 4and by the State Emergency Operations Plan, and programs, 5orders, rules and regulations as may be promulgated by the 6Illinois Emergency Management Agency and by local ordinance 7and, in addition, shall conduct such functions outside of 8those territorial limits as may be required under mutual aid 9agreements and compacts as are entered into under subparagraph 10(5) of paragraph (c) of Section 6.11    (j) In carrying out the provisions of this Act, each 12political subdivision may enter into contracts and incur 13obligations necessary to place it in a position effectively to 14combat the disasters as are described in Section 4, to protect 15the health and safety of persons, to protect property, and to 16provide emergency assistance to victims of those disasters. If 17a disaster occurs, each political subdivision may exercise the 18powers vested under this Section in the light of the 19exigencies of the disaster and, excepting mandatory 20constitutional requirements, without regard to the procedures 21and formalities normally prescribed by law pertaining to the 22performance of public work, entering into contracts, the 23incurring of obligations, the employment of temporary workers, 24the rental of equipment, the purchase of supplies and 25materials, and the appropriation, expenditure, and disposition 26of public funds and property.  SB2322- 43 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    (k) Volunteers who, while engaged in a disaster, an 2exercise, training related to the emergency operations plan of 3the political subdivision, or a search-and-rescue team 4response to an occurrence or threat of injury or loss of life 5that is beyond local response capabilities, suffer disease, 6injury or death, shall, for the purposes of benefits under the 7Workers' Compensation Act or Workers' Occupational Diseases 8Act only, be deemed to be employees of the State, if: (1) the 9claimant is a duly qualified and enrolled (sworn in) as a 10volunteer of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency or an 11emergency services and disaster agency accredited by the 12Illinois Emergency Management Agency, and (2) if: (i) the 13claimant was participating in a disaster as defined in Section 144 of this Act, (ii) the exercise or training participated in 15was specifically and expressly approved by the Illinois 16Emergency Management Agency prior to the exercise or training, 17or (iii) the search-and-rescue team response was to an 18occurrence or threat of injury or loss of life that was beyond 19local response capabilities and was specifically and expressly 20approved by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency prior to 21the search-and-rescue team response. The computation of 22benefits payable under either of those Acts shall be based on 23the income commensurate with comparable State employees doing 24the same type work or income from the person's regular 25employment, whichever is greater.26    Volunteers who are working under the direction of an   SB2322- 44 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1emergency services and disaster agency accredited by the 2Illinois Emergency Management Agency, pursuant to a plan 3approved by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency (i) 4during a disaster declared by the Governor under Section 7 of 5this Act, or (ii) in circumstances otherwise expressly 6approved by the Illinois Emergency Management Agency, shall be 7deemed exclusively employees of the State for purposes of 8Section 8(d) of the Court of Claims Act, provided that the 9Illinois Emergency Management Agency may, in coordination with 10the emergency services and disaster agency, audit 11implementation for compliance with the plan. 12    (l) If any person who is entitled to receive benefits 13through the application of this Section receives, in 14connection with the disease, injury or death giving rise to 15such entitlement, benefits under an Act of Congress or federal 16program, benefits payable under this Section shall be reduced 17to the extent of the benefits received under that other Act or 18program. 19    (m) (1) Prior to conducting an exercise, the principal 20    executive officer of a political subdivision or his or her 21    designee shall provide area media with written 22    notification of the exercise. The notification shall 23    indicate that information relating to the exercise shall 24    not be released to the public until the commencement of 25    the exercise. The notification shall also contain a 26    request that the notice be so posted to ensure that all   SB2322- 45 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    relevant media personnel are advised of the exercise 2    before it begins. 3        (2) During the conduct of an exercise, all messages, 4    two-way radio communications, briefings, status reports, 5    news releases, and other oral or written communications 6    shall begin and end with the following statement: "This is 7    an exercise message".8(Source: P.A. 94-733, eff. 4-27-06.) 9    (20 ILCS 3305/12)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1062)10    Sec. 12. Testing of Disaster Warning Devices. The testing 11of disaster warning devices including outdoor warning sirens 12shall be held only on the first Tuesday of each month at 10 13o'clock in the morning or during exercises that are 14specifically and expressly approved in advance by the Illinois 15Emergency Management Agency.16(Source: P.A. 92-73, eff. 1-1-02.) 17    (20 ILCS 3305/14)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1064)18    Sec. 14. Communications. The Illinois Emergency Management 19Agency shall ascertain what means exist for rapid and 20efficient communications in times of disaster. The Illinois 21Emergency Management Agency shall consider the desirability of 22supplementing these communications resources or of integrating 23them into a comprehensive State or State-Federal 24telecommunications or other communications system or network.   SB2322- 46 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1In studying the character and feasibility of any system or its 2several parts, the Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall 3evaluate the possibility of multipurpose use thereof for 4general State and political subdivision purposes. The Illinois 5Emergency Management Agency may promulgate rules to establish 6policies and procedures relating to telecommunications and the 7continuation of rapid and efficient communications in times of 8disaster to the extent authorized by any provision of this Act 9or other laws and regulations. The Illinois Emergency 10Management Agency shall make recommendations to the Governor 11as appropriate.12(Source: P.A. 86-755; 87-168.) 13    (20 ILCS 3305/17.8)14    Sec. 17.8. IEMA State Projects Fund. The IEMA State 15Projects Fund is created as a trust fund in the State treasury. 16The Fund shall consist of any moneys appropriated to the 17Agency for purposes of the Illinois' Not-For-Profit Security 18Grant Program, a grant program authorized by paragraph (5) of 19subsection (d) subsection (g-5) of Section 5 of this Act, to 20provide funding support for target hardening activities and 21other physical security enhancements for qualifying 22not-for-profit organizations that are at high risk of 23terrorist attack. The Agency is authorized to use moneys 24appropriated from the Fund to make grants to not-for-profit 25organizations for target hardening activities, security   SB2322- 47 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1personnel, and physical security enhancements and for the 2payment of administrative expenses associated with the 3Not-For-Profit Security Grant Program, except that, beginning 4July 1, 2024, the Agency shall not award grants under this 5Section to those entities whose primary purpose is to provide 6medical or mental health services. As used in this Section, 7"target hardening activities" include, but are not limited to, 8the purchase and installation of security equipment on real 9property owned or leased by the not-for-profit organization. 10Grants, gifts, and moneys from any other source, public or 11private, may also be deposited into the Fund and used for the 12purposes authorized by this Act.13(Source: P.A. 103-8, eff. 6-7-23; 103-588, eff. 6-5-24.) 14    (20 ILCS 3305/18)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1068)15    Sec. 18. Orders, Rules and Regulations. 16    (a) The Governor shall file a copy of every rule, 17regulation or order, and any amendment thereof made by the 18Governor under the provisions of this Act in the office of the 19Secretary of State. Upon No rule, regulation or order, or any 20amendment thereof shall be effective until 10 days after the 21filing, provided, however, that upon the declaration of a 22disaster by the Governor as is described in Section 7 the 23provision relating to the effective date of any rule, 24regulation, order or amendment issued under this Act and 25during the state of disaster is abrogated, and the rule,   SB2322- 48 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1regulation, order or amendment shall become effective 2immediately upon being filed with the Secretary of State 3accompanied by a certificate stating the reason as required by 4the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act.5    (b) Every emergency services and disaster agency 6established pursuant to this Act and the coordinators thereof 7shall execute and enforce the orders, rules and regulations as 8may be made by the Governor under authority of this Act. Each 9emergency services and disaster agency shall have available 10for inspection at its office all orders, rules and regulations 11made by the Governor, or under the Governor's authority. The 12Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall publish furnish on 13the Agency's Internet Department's website the orders, rules 14and regulations to each such emergency services and disaster 15agency. Upon the written request of an emergency services or 16disaster agency, copies thereof shall be mailed to the 17emergency services or disaster agency. 18(Source: P.A. 98-44, eff. 6-28-13.) 19    (20 ILCS 3305/20)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1070)20    Sec. 20. Oath Emergency Management Agency; personnel; 21oath. Each person, whether compensated or noncompensated, who 22is appointed to serve in any capacity in the Illinois 23Emergency Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security or 24an emergency services and disaster agency, shall, before 25entering upon his or her duties, take an oath, in writing,   SB2322- 49 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1before the Director or before the coordinator of that 2emergency services and disaster agency or before other persons 3authorized to administer oaths in this State, which oath shall 4be filed with the Director or with the coordinator of the 5emergency services and disaster agency with which he or she 6shall serve and which oath shall be substantially as follows:7    "I, _______________, do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I 8will support and defend and bear true faith and allegiance to 9the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of 10the State of Illinois, and the territory, institutions and 11facilities thereof, both public and private, against all 12enemies, foreign and domestic; that I take this obligation 13freely, without any mental reservation or purpose of evasion; 14and that I will well and faithfully discharge the duties upon 15which I am about to enter. And I do further swear (or affirm) 16that I do not advocate, nor am I, nor have I been a member of 17any political party or organization that advocates the 18overthrow of the government of the United States or of this 19State by force or violence; and that during such time as I am 20affiliated with the (name of political subdivision), I will 21not advocate nor become a member of any political party or 22organization that advocates the overthrow of the government of 23the United States or of this State by force or violence."24(Source: P.A. 92-73, eff. 1-1-02.) 25    (20 ILCS 3305/23)  SB2322- 50 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    (Section scheduled to be repealed on January 1, 2032)2    Sec. 23. Access and Functional Needs Advisory Committee.3    (a) In this Section, "Advisory Committee" means the Access 4and Functional Needs Advisory Committee.5    (b) The Access and Functional Needs Advisory Committee is 6created.7    (c) The Advisory Committee shall:8        (1) Coordinate meetings occurring, at a minimum, 3 9    times each year, in addition to emergency meetings called 10    by the chairperson of the Advisory Committee.11        (2) Research and provide recommendations for 12    identifying and effectively responding to the needs of 13    persons with access and functional needs before, during, 14    and after a disaster using an intersectional lens for 15    equity.16        (3) Provide recommendations to the Illinois Emergency 17    Management Agency regarding how to ensure that persons 18    with a disability are included in disaster strategies and 19    emergency management plans, including updates and 20    implementation of disaster strategies and emergency 21    management plans.22        (4) Review and provide recommendations for the 23    Illinois Emergency Management Agency, and all relevant 24    State agencies that are involved in drafting and 25    implementing the Illinois Emergency Operation Plan, to 26    integrate access and functional needs into State and local   SB2322- 51 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    emergency plans.2    (d) The Advisory Committee shall be composed of the 3Director of the Illinois Emergency Management Agency or his or 4her designee, the Attorney General or his or her designee, the 5Secretary of Human Services or his or her designee, the 6Director of Aging or his or her designee, and the Director of 7Public Health or his or her designee, together with the 8following members appointed by the Governor on or before 9January 1, 2022:10        (1) Two members, either from a municipal or 11    county-level emergency agency or a local emergency 12    management coordinator.13        (2) Nine members from the community of persons with a 14    disability who represent persons with different types of 15    disabilities, including, but not limited to, individuals 16    with mobility and physical disabilities, hearing and 17    visual disabilities, deafness or who are hard of hearing, 18    blindness or who have low vision, mental health 19    disabilities, and intellectual or developmental 20    disabilities. Members appointed under this paragraph shall 21    reflect a diversity of age, gender, race, and ethnic 22    background.23        (3) Four members who represent first responders from 24    different geographical regions around the State.25    (e) Of those members appointed by the Governor, the 26initial appointments of 6 members shall be for terms of 2 years   SB2322- 52 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1and the initial appointments of 5 members shall be for terms of 24 years. Thereafter, members shall be appointed for terms of 4 3years. A member shall serve until his or her successor is 4appointed and qualified. If a vacancy occurs in the Advisory 5Committee membership, the vacancy shall be filled in the same 6manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the 7unexpired term. 8    (f) After all the members are appointed, and annually 9thereafter, they shall elect a chairperson from among the 10members appointed under paragraph (2) of subsection (d).11    (g) The initial meeting of the Advisory Committee shall be 12convened by the Director of the Illinois Emergency Management 13Agency no later than February 1, 2022.14    (h) Advisory Committee members shall serve without 15compensation.16    (i) The Illinois Emergency Management Agency shall provide 17administrative support to the Advisory Committee.18    (j) The Advisory Committee shall prepare and deliver a 19report to the General Assembly, the Governor's Office, and the 20Illinois Emergency Management Agency by July 1, 2022, and 21annually thereafter. The report shall include the following:22        (1) Identification of core emergency management 23    services that need to be updated or changed to ensure the 24    needs of persons with a disability are met, and shall 25    include disaster strategies in State and local emergency 26    plans.  SB2322- 53 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        (2) Any proposed changes in State policies, laws, 2    rules, or regulations necessary to fulfill the purposes of 3    this Act.4        (3) Recommendations on improving the accessibility and 5    effectiveness of disaster and emergency communication.6        (4) Recommendations on comprehensive training for 7    first responders and other frontline workers when working 8    with persons with a disability during emergency situations 9    or disasters, as defined in Section 4 of the Illinois 10    Emergency Management and Homeland Security Agency Act.11        (5) Any additional recommendations regarding emergency 12    management and persons with a disability that the Advisory 13    Committee deems necessary.14    (k) The annual report prepared and delivered under 15subsection (j) shall be annually considered by the Illinois 16Emergency Management Agency when developing new State and 17local emergency plans or updating existing State and local 18emergency plans.19    (l) The Advisory Committee is dissolved and this Section 20is repealed on January 1, 2032.21(Source: P.A. 102-361, eff. 8-13-21; 102-671, eff. 11-30-21; 22103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 23    (20 ILCS 3305/24 new)24    Sec. 24. Illinois Homeland Security Advisory Council 25(IL-HSAC).  SB2322- 54 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    (a) There shall be created an Illinois Homeland Security 2Advisory Council (IL-HSAC).3    (b) The IL-HSAC shall report directly to the Homeland 4Security Advisor who shall serve as the chairperson and submit 5an annual report to the Governor by March of each year. The 6report shall detail the activities, accomplishments, and 7recommendations of the IL-HSAC in the preceding year.8    (c) The Agency shall provide administrative support for 9the IL-HSAC.10    (d) Entities may be appointed to IL-HSAC by the Governor.11    (e) The duties of IL-HSAC shall be as follows:12        (1) Develops and provides recommendations regarding 13    the State's domestic terrorism preparedness strategy.14        (2) Seeks appropriate input from federal agencies, 15    including, but not limited to, the United States 16    Department of Justice, the Federal Bureau of 17    Investigation, the Federal Emergency Management Agency, 18    the United States Department of Health and Human Services, 19    and the United States Department of Homeland Security.20        (3) Serves as the Illinois Senior Advisory Committee 21    (SAC) with respect to funds received through the federal 22    Homeland Security Grant Program. In that capacity, the 23    IL-HSAC shall provide recommendations to the Agency and to 24    the Homeland Security Advisor on issues related to the 25    application for and use of all appropriate federal funding 26    that relates to preventing, protecting against,   SB2322- 55 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    mitigating, responding to, and recovering from acts of 2    terrorism and other threats.3        (4) Provides recommendations to the Agency and to the 4    Homeland Security Advisor on the following:5            (A) Appropriate training of local, regional and 6        State officials to respond to terrorist incidents 7        involving conventional, chemical, biological and/or 8        nuclear weapons.9            (B) Issues related to the application for and use 10        of all appropriate State and other funds as may be 11        appropriate and available relating to homeland 12        security.13            (C) Issues relating to public safety preparedness 14        and mutual aid to include strategies and tactics to 15        coordinate multi-agency response to significant 16        events, act of terrorism or natural disasters where 17        coordination of local, state and private resources is 18        necessary.19            (D) Coordination of public safety resources and 20        combating terrorism in Illinois.21            (E) Any changes needed in State statutes, 22        administrative regulations, or in the Illinois 23        Emergency Operations Plan. 24    (20 ILCS 3305/26 new)25    Sec. 26. Illinois Cybersecurity Commission.  SB2322- 56 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    (a) There shall be created an Illinois Cybersecurity 2Commission.3    (b) The Commission shall report directly to the Homeland 4Security Advisor who shall serve as chairperson. The Deputy 5Director of Homeland Security as indicated in subsection 65(d)(B)(i) shall serve as chairperson in the absence of the 7Homeland Security Advisor.8    (c) The chairperson shall submit a report to the Governor 9by December of each calendar year detailing the activities, 10accomplishments, and recommendations of the Commission.11    (d) The Commission shall be comprised of the following 12members:13        (1) Voting Members:14            (A) The Governor's Homeland Security Advisor or 15        Deputy Homeland Security Advisor;16            (B) The Director of the Illinois Emergency 17        Management Agency and Office of Homeland Security, or 18        his or her designee;19            (C) The Chief Information Security Officer of the 20        Illinois Department of Innovation and Technology, or 21        his or her designee;22            (D) The Illinois Attorney General, or his or her 23        designee;24            (E) The Adjutant General of the Illinois National 25        Guard, or his or her designee;26            (F) The Director of the Illinois State Police, or   SB2322- 57 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        his or her designee;2            (G) The Chairman of the Illinois Commerce 3        Commission, or his or her designee;4            (H) The Director of the Illinois Department of 5        Commerce and Economic Opportunity, or his or her 6        designee;7            (I) The Director of the Illinois Department of 8        Revenue, or his or her designee; and9            (J) A representative of the Office of the 10        Governor.11        (2) Non-Voting Members:12            (A) One representative representing the 13        Information Technology Sector;14            (B) One representative representing the 15        Communications Sector;16            (C) One representative representing the Defense 17        Industrial Base Sector;18            (D) One representative representing the Energy 19        Sector;20            (E) One representative representing the Financial 21        Services Sector;22            (F) One representative representing the Healthcare 23        and Public Health Sector; and24            (G) One representative representing the Water and 25        Wastewater Systems Sector.26            (H) The Commission may also include as non-voting   SB2322- 58 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1        members:2                (i) A cybersecurity expert from the Chicago or 3            Springfield field office of the Federal Bureau of 4            Investigation; and5                (ii) Two cybersecurity experts from the United 6            States Department of Homeland Security, as 7            follows:8                    (I) One cybersecurity expert from the 9                Region 5 Office of the Cybersecurity and 10                Infrastructure Security Agency; and11                    (II) One cybersecurity expert from the 12                Chicago Field Office of the United States 13                Secret Service.14        (3) Advisory Members:15            (A) A representative from the Statewide 16        Intelligence Center (STIC); and17            (B) The Commission may appoint additional advisory 18        members from both the public and private sectors that 19        will provide subject matter expertise.20        With the exception of the STIC representative, all 21    advisory members shall be approved by a majority of the 22    voting members.23    (e) The duties and responsibilities of the Commission 24shall be as follows:25        (1) Builds and enhances cyber awareness and training 26    for private sector critical infrastructure entities,   SB2322- 59 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    including education opportunities on ways to prevent 2    cybersecurity attacks and protect personal information;3        (2) Develops practices, processes, and the overall 4    planning procedures required to protect valuable 5    information, resources, and services, including 6    identifying and disrupting cyber-attacks, improving and 7    expanding statewide security incident response 8    capabilities, and promoting and facilitating cross sector 9    and community training and exercise scenarios for private 10    sector critical infrastructure partners to secure critical 11    systems that serve the public;12        (3) Develops best practices to help private sector 13    critical infrastructure organizations make risk-based 14    decisions for improving cybersecurity; and15        (4) Creates and expands partnerships with critical 16    infrastructure sectors to foster continual learning and 17    information sharing, ensuring the safety and resiliency of 18    digital infrastructure and the promoting of 19    identification, evaluation, and information sharing on 20    threats and vulnerabilities impacting the State. 21    (20 ILCS 3305/27 new)22    Sec. 27. Statewide Interoperability Coordinator (SWIC).23    (a) As part of the Agency's Office of Homeland Security, 24there shall be a position created for the Statewide 25Interoperability Coordinator (SWIC).  SB2322- 60 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    (b) The duties and responsibilities of the SWIC shall be 2as follows:3        (1) Serves as the central coordination point for the 4    State's communications interoperability and assists with 5    mediation between State and local agencies to achieve an 6    interoperable communications system;7        (2) Develops and disseminates best practices for 8    public safety communications interoperability;9        (3) Advises the Homeland Security Advisor and Deputy 10    Director of the Agency's Office of Homeland Security on 11    public safety communications interoperability;12        (4) Serves as a member of the Statewide 13    Interoperability Executive Committee (SIEC) or its 14    successor entity and may act on behalf of the SIEC;15        (5) Recommends regulatory changes relating to 16    telecommunications and the continuation of rapid and 17    efficient communications during a disaster;18        (6) Identifies funding opportunities for planned 19    interoperability improvements and coordinates efforts to 20    provide funding;21        (7) Advises on the issuance of grants for 22    interoperability communication systems;23        (8) Engages stakeholders to coordinate the Statewide 24    Communications Interoperability Plan (SCIP);25        (9) Represents the State in national, regional, and 26    local efforts to plan and implement changes needed to   SB2322- 61 -LRB104 12191 BDA 22295 b1    achieve interoperability and continuity of communications 2    for emergency responders; and3        (10) Develops and implements the strategic program for 4    all public safety communications and interoperability 5    activities in partnership with 9-1-1 A    dministrator, 6    operators of statewide radio systems, emergency management 7    coordinators, and the State Administrative Agency (SAA).